Hawaii statutes.
[§141-2.7] Aquaculture development special
fund. (a) There is established in the state treasury the aquaculture
development special fund into which shall be deposited:

(1) Appropriations from the legislature;

(2) Moneys collected as fees for special microbiological
and histological procedures and expert aquaculture-related services;

(3) Moneys collected from the sale of any item
related to aquaculture development that is purchased from the department;

(4) Moneys directed to the aquaculture development
program from any other sources, including but not limited to grants, gifts, and
awards; and

(5) Moneys derived from interest, dividend, or other
income from the above sources.

(b) Moneys in the aquaculture development
special fund shall be used to:

(1) Implement the aquatic disease management programs
and activities of the department, including provision of state funds to match
federal grants; and

(2) Support research and development programs and
activities relating to the expansion of the state aquaculture industry.
Research and development programs and activities funded under this paragraph
may be conducted by department personnel or through contracts with the
University of Hawaii or other qualified persons. [L 2000, c 193, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next